Missouri, session 2026, HB2994.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 307.128, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 307.128, to read as follows:
307.128. 1. A headlamp on a motorcycle may be wired to modulate either the upper
beam or the lower beam from its maximum intensity to a lesser intensity provided that:
(1) The rate of modulation shall be two hundred forty plus or minus forty cycles per
minute;
(2) The headlamp shall be operated at a maximum power for fifty to seventy percent
of each cycle;
(3) The lowest intensity at any test point shall not be less than seventeen percent of
the maximum intensity measured at the same point;
(4) The modulator switch shall be wired in the power lead of the beam filament being
modulated and not in the ground side of the circuit;
(5) Means shall be provided so that both the lower beam and the upper beam remain
operable in the event of a modulation failure;
(6) The system shall include a sensor mounted with the axis of its sensing element
perpendicular to a horizontal plane. Headlamp modulation shall cease whenever the level of
light emitted by a tungsten filament operating at three thousand degrees kelvin is either less
than two hundred seventy lux of direct light for upward pointing sensors or less than sixty lux
of reflected light for downward pointing sensors. The light is measured by a silicon cell type
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2994 2
light meter that is located at the sensor and pointing in the same direction as the sensor. A
photo gray card is placed at ground level to simulate the road surface in testing downward
pointing sensors;
(7) Means shall be provided so that both the lower and upper beam function at design
voltage when the headlamp control switch is in either the lower or upper beam position when
the modulator is off.
2. Each motorcycle headlamp modulator not intended as original equipment, or its
container, shall be labeled with the maximum wattage, and the minimum wattage appropriate
for its use. Additionally, each such modulator shall comply with the provisions of
subdivisions (1) to (7) of subsection 1 of this section when connected to a headlamp of the
maximum-rated power and headlamp of the minimum-rated power, and shall provide means
so that the modulated beam functions at design voltage when the modulator is off.
Instructions, with a diagram, shall be provided for mounting the light sensor including
location on the motorcycle, distance above the road surface, and orientation with respect to
the light.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to the requirements of
subsection 4 of this section, a motorcycle may be equipped with, and an operator of a
motorcycle may use, the following auxiliary lighting:
(1) [Amber and white] Any color illumination;
(2) Standard bulb running lights; or
(3) Light-emitting diode pods and strips.
4. Lighting under subsection 3 of this section shall be:
(1) Nonblinking;
(2) Nonflashing;
(3) Nonoscillating; and
(4) Directed toward the engine and the drive train of the motorcycle to prevent
interference with the driver's operation of the vehicle.
✔